Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.300

Model schools and training departments—Purpose.

A model school or schools or training departments may be provided for The Evergreen State College, in which students, before graduation, may have actual practice in teaching or courses relative thereto under the supervision and observation of critic teachers. All schools or departments involved herewith shall organize and direct their work being cognizant of public school needs.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 73; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.300. Prior: 1917 c 128 s 2; 1909 c 97 p 253 s 8; RRS s 4611; prior: 1897 c 118 s 219; 1893 c 107 s 12. Formerly RCW 28.81.058; 28.81.050(12).]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.